Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,303
Nebraska Environmental Response Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Environmental Response Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature, grants, contributions designated for the purpose of the fund, and money recovered under the Nebraska Environmental Response Act. The fund shall be administered by the department and used for control, abatement, analysis, cleanup, prevention, mitigation, investigation, and other reasonable costs incurred when responding to a release. All other costs of the department necessary to carry out the Nebraska Environmental Response Act shall be paid from the fund. The fund shall not be used to pay for the costs of releases for which costs are paid under the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Environmental Response Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 205.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act, see section 66-1501.